Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1,101
Attorney General; delegation of powers and duties.

The Attorney General may authorize the deputy attorney general in charge of the Claims Division of the Department of Justice to perform any of the duties imposed upon the Attorney General by sections 48-192 to 48-1,109, and may employ other persons, firms, or corporations to investigate claims under sections 48-192 to 48-1,109.

Laws 1971, LB 390, § 10.